Ohio, session 136, HB859.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That section 2935.40 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 2935.40. (A) Notwithstanding any contrary provision of the Revised Code, but subject to division (B) of this section, a person is privileged from arrest pursuant to a civil or administrative warrant based on the person's citizenship or immigration status while any of the following apply: (1) The person is on the premises or grounds of a public or private primary or secondary school or other educational institution. (2) The person is on the premises or grounds of a church, synagogue, or other established place of religious worship or is attending a public religious ceremony. (3) The person is on the premises or grounds of a health care facility, including a facility a state agency maintains or operates to provide health care, or a health care practitioner's office. As used in this division, "health care facility" has the same meaning as in section 1751.01 of the Revised Code. (4) The person is on the premises or grounds of a facility that provides forensic medical examinations to sexual assault survivors. (5) The person is on the premises or grounds of an organization for assisting children, pregnant women, victims of crime or abuse, or individuals with mental or physical disabilities, or any other social service agency providing services to the public. (6) The person is on the premises or grounds of a courthouse or other building or structure in which a courtroom is located. (B) Division (A) of this section does not prohibit any arrest pursuant to a lawful judicial warrant issued in a criminal proceeding.